Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.341

Revocation or suspension of license—Grounds—Appeal to board—Fee—Costs.

(1) The department has the power, in case of serious noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter, to revoke or suspend for such a period as it determines, any electrical or telecommunications contractor license or electrical or telecommunications contractor administrator certificate issued under this chapter. The department shall notify the holder of the license or certificate of the revocation or suspension using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed. A revocation or suspension is effective twenty days after the holder receives the notice. Any revocation or suspension is subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of a revocation or suspension until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the revocation or suspension is given using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed sent to the address of the holder of the license or certificate as shown on the application for the license or certificate, and shall be effected by filing a written notice of appeal with the department, accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the holder of the license or certificate if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the two hundred dollars shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund.

(2) The department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2011 c 301 s 8; 2000 c 238 s 4; 1997 c 58 s 844; 1996 c 241 s 5; 1988 c 81 s 10; 1986 c 156 s 10; 1983 c 206 s 11; 1935 c 169 s 7; RRS s 8307-7. Formerly RCW 19.28.310, 19.28.320.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.